Tennessee, session 114, HB1450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 40, Chapter 11, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Family," when used with reference to a person, includes:
(A) Any person related to such person within the third degree of
consanguinity or affinity; or
(B) Any person living in the same household as such person; and
(2) "Legal guardian" means a person having the legal authority to provide
for the care, supervision, and control of a minor child as established by law or
court order.
(b) An entity, however organized, shall not secure the release of a defendant
unless specifically authorized under this chapter.
(c) An entity, other than the defendant, a member of the defendant's family, the
defendant's legal guardian, the defendant's employer, or a professional bondsman
authorized under § 40-11-124, seeking to secure the release of a defendant must be
approved in accordance with § 40-11-123 for each bond the entity seeks to secure.
(d) An entity, other than the defendant, a member of the defendant's family, the
defendant's legal guardian, the defendant's employer, or a professional bondsman
authorized under § 40-11-124, shall not post security for more than three (3) defendants
in any calendar year, or for a single defendant more than one (1) time per calendar year.
HB1450
009770
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-11-715, is amended by deleting
"bonding agent" and substituting "proposed surety".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009770